District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

16-2502

Notice; contents.

[Repealed].

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 595, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Nov. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 20-37, § 3(b), 60 DCR 12145

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-2502.
1973 Ed., § 16-2502.